Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.95.060

Washington advanced college tuition payment program account.

(1) The Washington advanced college tuition payment program account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. The account shall be a discrete nontreasury account retaining its interest earnings in accordance with RCW 43.79A.040.

(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the governing body shall deposit in the account all money received for the program. The account shall be self-sustaining and consist of payments received from purchasers of tuition units and funds received from other sources, public or private. With the exception of investment and operating costs associated with the investment of money by the investment board paid under RCW 43.33A.160 and 43.84.160, the account shall be credited with all investment income earned by the account. Disbursements from the account are exempt from appropriations and the allotment provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW. Money used for program administration is subject to the allotment of all expenditures. However, an appropriation is not required for such expenditures. Program administration shall include, but not be limited to: The salaries and expenses of the program personnel including lease payments, travel, and goods and services necessary for program operation; contracts for program promotion and advertisement, audits, and account management; and other general costs of conducting the business of the program.

(b) All money received by the program from the office for the GET ready for math and science scholarship program shall be deposited in the GET ready for math and science scholarship account created in RCW 28B.105.110.

(3) The assets of the account may be spent without appropriation for the purpose of making payments to institutions of higher education on behalf of the qualified beneficiaries, making refunds, transfers, or direct payments upon the termination of the Washington advanced college tuition payment program. Disbursements from the account shall be made only on the authorization of the governing body.

(4) With regard to the assets of the account, the state acts in a fiduciary, not ownership, capacity. Therefore the assets of the program are not considered state money, common cash, or revenue to the state.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 172; 2007 c 214 s 13; 2000 c 14 s 5; 1998 c 69 s 4; 1997 c 289 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Effective date—1998 c 69: See note following RCW 28B.95.025.